Massachusetts, session 194th, S1732.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 148 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by adding after section 26I, the following section: -  
Section 26J. In any city or town which accepts the provisions of this section, every newly 
constructed building, designed or used for residential occupancy and containing not more than 
two dwelling units, shall be protected throughout with an adequate system of automatic 
sprinklers installed in accordance with the provisions of the state building code. The provisions 
of this section shall apply to any such newly constructed building for which a building permit is 
issued on or after one year from the acceptance of this act by a city or town. Nothing in this 
section shall require any existing building designed or used for residential occupancy, to be 
required to retrofit said property with an automatic sprinkler system.  

of 2 11  The head of the fire department shall enforce the provisions of this section.  
Whoever is aggrieved by the head of the fire department’s interpretation, order, 
requirement, direction or failure to act under the provisions of this section, may, within forty-five 
days after the service of notice thereof, appeal from such interpretation, order, requirement, 
direction, or failure to act, to the board of appeals as provided in section 201 of chapter 6.  
SECTION 2. Section 27A of chapter 148, as so appearing, is amended by inserting, after 
the word “service”, in line 19, the following sentence:- This section shall not apply to the 
seasonal shut-off of automatic sprinklers installed in accordance with the provisions of section 
26J of chapter 148, when such shut off has been conducted in accordance with the procedures 
established by the Board of Fire Prevention Regulations. For purposes of this section, the Board 
shall determine what constitutes a seasonal shutoff of automatic sprinklers.